Nebraska, session 109, LB513A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $26,838 from the General Fund
for FY2025-26 and (2) $53,775 from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to the
Supreme Court, for Program 3, to aid in carrying out the provisions of
Legislative Bill 513, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $23,631 for FY2025-26 or
$47,616 for FY2026-27.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated (1) $21,976 from the General Fund
for FY2025-26 and (2) $44,023 from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to the
Supreme Court, for Program 4, to aid in carrying out the provisions of
Legislative Bill 513, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $19,242 for FY2025-26 or
$38,774 for FY2026-27.
Sec. 3. There is hereby appropriated (1) $250,398 from the General Fund
for FY2025-26 and (2) $501,519 from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to the
Supreme Court, for Program 6, to aid in carrying out the provisions of
Legislative Bill 513, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $218,585 for FY2025-26 or
$440,449 for FY2026-27.
Sec. 4. There is hereby appropriated (1) $205,999 from the General Fund
for FY2025-26 and (2) $412,530 from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to the
Supreme Court, for Program 7, to aid in carrying out the provisions of
Legislative Bill 513, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $179,257 for FY2025-26 or
$361,202 for FY2026-27.
Sec. 5. There is hereby appropriated (1) $21,574 from the Compensation
Court Cash Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $43,211 from the Compensation Court Cash
Fund for FY2026-27 to the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court, for Program
526, to aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 513, One Hundred
Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $18,736 for FY2025-26 or
$37,753 for FY2026-27.
Sec. 6. There is hereby appropriated (1) $12,051 from the General Fund
for FY2025-26 and (2) $24,283 from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to the Tax
Equalization and Review Commission, for Program 131, to aid in carrying out the
provisions of Legislative Bill 513, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First
Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $10,465 for FY2025-26 or
$21,087 for FY2026-27.
Sec. 7. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-